Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 2.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201079-773
Legislative findings.

(1) The Legislature finds
that:

(a) Since 1928, Nebraska
students have benefited from participation in career education student organizations
such as Nebraska FFA, Family Career and Community Leaders of America (FCCLA),
Future Business Leaders of America (FBLA), Skills USA, Nebraska DECA, and
Health Occupations Students of America (HOSA);

(b) Research conducted in 2007 by
the National Research Center for Career and Technical Education has documented
a positive association between career education student organizations participation
and academic motivation, academic engagement, grades, career self-efficacy,
college aspirations, and employability skills;

(c) Long-term sustainability of
the state associations of career education student organizations has a positive
impact on Nebraska students and is in the best interests of the economic well-being
of the State of Nebraska;

(d)
Students in Nebraska schools should have opportunities to acquire academic,
technical, and employability knowledge and skills needed to meet the demands
of a global economy;

(e)
Students benefit from the opportunities provided by career education student
organizations to develop and demonstrate leadership skills that prepare them
for civic, economic, and entrepreneurial leadership roles;

(f) Students benefit
from engaging in extended-learning experiences outside their normal classrooms
that allow them to apply their knowledge and skill in real-world situations;

(g) There is a need to
establish and expand strategies and programs that enable young people to be
college-ready and career-ready, build assets, and remain as productive citizens
in their communities; and

(h)
There is a need to establish a statewide structure that supports existing
and emerging curriculum and program offerings with student leadership development
opportunities and experiences.

(2) The Legislature recognizes that Nebraska must
provide opportunities to educate young people with leadership and employability
skills to (a) meet the needs of business and industry and remain economically
viable, (b) educate and nurture future entrepreneurs for successful business
ventures to diversify and strengthen our economic base, (c) foster rewarding
personal development experiences that involve students in their communities
and encourage them to return to their communities after completing postsecondary
education, and (d) invest in and support the leadership development of our
future state and community civic leaders.

Laws 2009, LB476, § 2.